test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-мя-имя_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - имя M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      имя+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom: имя
      имя+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc: имя
      имя+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen: имени
      имя+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc: имени
      имя+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat: имени
      имя+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins: именем
      имя+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Nom: имена
      имя+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Acc: имена
      имя+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen: [имён, имен]
      имя+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Loc: именах
      имя+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Dat: именам
      имя+N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Ins: именами
